Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
60-3102
State Fleet Card Fund; created; rebates
credited to fund; use.

The
State Fleet Card Fund is hereby created. All rebates received by the state
from the fleet card program entered into by the State of Nebraska pursuant
to section 60-3101 shall be credited to the fund. The fund may consist of
fleet card rebates received on behalf of state officers, agencies, boards,
and commissions and political subdivisions and shall be administered by the
State Treasurer. Fleet card rebates received on behalf of state officers,
agencies, boards, and commissions shall be transferred by the State Treasurer
from the fund to the General Fund. Fleet card rebates received on behalf of
political subdivisions shall be disbursed to political subdivisions consistent
with the volume spent and contract terms.

Laws 2013, LB137, § 2.